src/morphology/stems/punct.lexc
LEXICON SYMBOL_PILKKU

:  # ;

%+Pl%+Abe:%:{MB}i{MB}tta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Abl:%:{MB}i{MB}lta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ade:%:{MB}i{MB}lla  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+All:%:{MB}i{MB}lle  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ela:%:{MB}i{MB}sta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ess:%:{MB}i{MB}na  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Gen:%:{MB}i{MB}den  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ill:%:{MB}i{MB}hin  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ine:%:{MB}i{MB}ssa  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ins:%:{MB}i{MB}n  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Nom:%:{MB}t  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Par:%:{MB}i{MB}ta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Tra:%:{MB}i{MB}kse  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

%+Pl%+Tra:%:{MB}i{MB}ksi  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Abe:%:{MB}tta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Abl:%:{MB}lta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ade:%:{MB}lla  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+All:%:{MB}lle  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ela:%:{MB}sta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ess:%:{MB}na  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Gen:%:{MB}n  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ill:%:{MB}seen  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ine:%:{MB}ssa  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Nom:%:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS ;
%+Sg%+Nom:%:  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT ;

%+Sg%+Par:%:{MB}tta  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Tra:%:{MB}kse  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

%+Sg%+Tra:%:{MB}ksi  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:  SYMBOL_COMPOUND ;

%+Com:%:{MB}i{MB}ne  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_PISTE

:  # ;

%+Pl%+Abe:%:{MB}i{MB}ttä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Abl:%:{MB}i{MB}ltä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ade:%:{MB}i{MB}llä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+All:%:{MB}i{MB}lle  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ela:%:{MB}i{MB}stä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ess:%:{MB}i{MB}nä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Gen:%:{MB}i{MB}den  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ill:%:{MB}i{MB}hin  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ine:%:{MB}i{MB}ssä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Ins:%:{MB}i{MB}n  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Nom:%:{MB}t  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Par:%:{MB}i{MB}tä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Pl%+Tra:%:{MB}i{MB}kse  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

%+Pl%+Tra:%:{MB}i{MB}ksi  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Abe:%:{MB}ttä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Abl:%:{MB}ltä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ade:%:{MB}llä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+All:%:{MB}lle  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ela:%:{MB}stä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ess:%:{MB}nä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Gen:%:{MB}n  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ill:%:{MB}seen  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Ine:%:{MB}ssä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Nom:%:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS ;
%+Sg%+Nom:%:  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT ;

%+Sg%+Par:%:{MB}ttä  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

%+Sg%+Tra:%:{MB}kse  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

%+Sg%+Tra:%:{MB}ksi  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:  SYMBOL_COMPOUND ;

%+Com:%:{MB}i{MB}ne  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;



LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT

%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}han  # ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}han{MB}kaan  # ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}han{MB}ko  # ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}han{MB}pa  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kaan  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kaan{MB}han  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kaan{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kaan{MB}ko  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kaan{MB}pa  # ;

%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kin{MB}han  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kin{MB}kaan  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kin{MB}ko  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kin{MB}pa  # ;

%+Foc%_kO:{MB}ko  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}ko{MB}han  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}ko{MB}kaan  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kin:{MB}ko{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_pA:{MB}ko{MB}pa  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_s:{MB}ko{MB}s  # ;

%+Foc%_pA:{MB}pa  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}pa{MB}han  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}pa{MB}kaan  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kin:{MB}pa{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kO:{MB}pa{MB}ko  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_s:{MB}pa{MB}s  # ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT

:  # ;
:  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_POSS

%+Px3:{MB}nsa  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl1:{MB}mme  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl2:{MB}nne  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg1:{MB}ni  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg2:{MB}si  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN

%+Px3:{MB}an  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT

:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_AN ;
:  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT

:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN

%+Px3:{MB}en  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL

:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT

:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_BACK_POSS_EN ;
:  SYMBOL_BACK_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_COMPOUND

%+TruncPrefix:-  # ;

#:-  NOUN ;
#:-  ADJECTIVE ;
#:-  SUFFIX ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT

%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}hän  # ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}hän{MB}kään  # ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}hän{MB}kö  # ;

%+Foc%_hAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}hän{MB}pä  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kään  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kään{MB}hän  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kään{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kään{MB}kö  # ;

%+Foc%_kAAn%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kään{MB}pä  # ;

%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kin{MB}hän  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kin{MB}kään  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kin{MB}kö  # ;

%+Foc%_kin%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kin{MB}pä  # ;

%+Foc%_kO:{MB}kö  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}kö{MB}hän  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}kö{MB}kään  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_kin:{MB}kö{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_pA:{MB}kö{MB}pä  # ;

%+Foc%_kO%+Foc%_s:{MB}kö{MB}s  # ;

%+Foc%_pA:{MB}pä  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_hAn:{MB}pä{MB}hän  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kAAn:{MB}pä{MB}kään  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kin:{MB}pä{MB}kin  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_kO:{MB}pä{MB}kö  # ;

%+Foc%_pA%+Foc%_s:{MB}pä{MB}s  # ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT

:  # ;
:  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS

%+Px3:{MB}nsä  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl1:{MB}mme  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxPl2:{MB}nne  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg1:{MB}ni  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

%+PxSg2:{MB}si  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT

:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN

%+Px3:{MB}en  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL

:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT

:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_EN ;
:  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT ;
:  # ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN

%+Px3:{MB}än  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT

:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS ;
:  SYMBOL_FRONT_POSS_ÄN ;
:  SYMBOL_FRONT_CLIT ;
:  # ;

LEXICON SYM_,

:	# ;

+Pl+Abe:%:%>i%>tta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%:%>i%>lta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%:%>i%>lla	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%:%>i%>lle	SYM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%:%>i%>sta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:%:%>i%>na	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%:%>i%>den	SYM_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%:%>i%>hin	SYM_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%:%>i%>ssa	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%:%>i%>n	SYM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:%:%>t	SYM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:%:%>i%>ta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%:%>i%>kse	SYM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%:%>i%>ksi	SYM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abe:%:%>tta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%:%>lta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%:%>lla	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%:%>lle	SYM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%:%>sta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%:%>na	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%:%>n	SYM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%:%>seen	SYM_BACK_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%:%>ssa	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:%:	SYM_BACK_POSS ;

+Sg+Nom:%:	SYM_BACK_CLIT ;

+Sg+Par:%:%>tta	SYM_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%:%>kse	SYM_BACK_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%:%>ksi	SYM_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

:	SYM_COMPOUND ;

+Com:%:%>i%>ne	SYM_BACK_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON SYM_.

:	# ;

+Pl+Abe:%:%>i%>ttä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Abl:%:%>i%>ltä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ade:%:%>i%>llä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+All:%:%>i%>lle	SYM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ela:%:%>i%>stä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ess:%:%>i%>nä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Gen:%:%>i%>den	SYM_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ill:%:%>i%>hin	SYM_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Ine:%:%>i%>ssä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Ins:%:%>i%>n	SYM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Nom:%:%>t	SYM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Pl+Par:%:%>i%>tä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Pl+Tra:%:%>i%>kse	SYM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Pl+Tra:%:%>i%>ksi	SYM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Abe:%:%>ttä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Abl:%:%>ltä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ade:%:%>llä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+All:%:%>lle	SYM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ela:%:%>stä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Ess:%:%>nä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Gen:%:%>n	SYM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ill:%:%>seen	SYM_FRONT_POSS_CLIT_OPT ;

+Sg+Ine:%:%>ssä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Nom:%:	SYM_FRONT_POSS ;

+Sg+Nom:%:	SYM_FRONT_CLIT ;

+Sg+Par:%:%>ttä	SYM_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;

+Sg+Tra:%:%>kse	SYM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OBL ;

+Sg+Tra:%:%>ksi	SYM_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

:	SYM_COMPOUND ;

+Com:%:%>i%>ne	SYM_FRONT_POSS_EN_OPT ;


LEXICON SYM_§

:	NOUN_ACRO_NELJÄ ;


LEXICON SYM_¢

:%:e	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_PLURALS ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_COMPOUND ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_SG_NOM ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_CASES ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_POSS ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_FRONT_CLIT ;


LEXICON SYM_$

:%:	SYM_BACK_CASES ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_POSS ;

:	SYM_COMPOUND ;

:	SYM_BACK_SG_NOM ;


LEXICON SYM_£

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CASES ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_COMPOUND ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM ;


LEXICON SYM_€

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CASES ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_ON ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_COMPOUND ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM ;


LEXICON SYM_CELSIUS

:	NOUN_ACRO_KUUSI ;


LEXICON SYM_GRAMMA

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CASES ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_COMPOUND ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM ;


LEXICON SYM_JOULE

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CASES ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_JEN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_COMPOUND ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM ;


LEXICON SYM_METRI

:	SYM_¢ ;


LEXICON SYM_TUOTE

:%:	SYM_BACK_CASES ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_POSS ;

:%:	SYM_BACK_CLIT ;

:	SYM_COMPOUND ;

:	SYM_BACK_SG_NOM ;


LEXICON SYM_WEBER

:	SYM_COMPOUND ;

:	SYM_FRONT_SG_NOM ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_CASES ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IN ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_PARTITIVE_Ä ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_POSS ;

:%:	SYM_FRONT_CLIT ;


LEXICON SYM_Ω

:%:e	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PLURALS ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CASES ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_ILLATIVE_IN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_PARTITIVE_JA ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_POSS ;

:%:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_CLIT ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_COMPOUND ;

:	NOUN_ACRO_BACK_SG_NOM ;

LEXICON PUNCT_NONSTD_DASH_LOOP

:-	PUNCT_NONSTD_DASH_LOOP ;

:–	PUNCT_NONSTD_DASH_LOOP ;

+Err/Orth:-	# ;

+Err/Orth:–	# ;
